Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1702
Assignment instrument; terms.

An assignment instrument may provide that any or all obligations covered by, described in, or identified by the assignment instrument are to be secured by present, future, or after-arising rents or leases. The obligations covered by, described in, or identified by an assignment instrument may include future advances or other value whether or not the future advances or value are given pursuant to an existing commitment to loan additional funds.

Laws 1993, LB 14, § 2.